Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1479
Contributions made for transfer or in behalf of a committee; unlawful; exceptions; penalty.

(1) Except as provided by subsections (3) and (4) of section 49-1479.01, a contribution shall not be made by a person to another person with the agreement or arrangement that the person receiving the contribution will then transfer that contribution to a particular candidate committee.

(2) A candidate committee shall not make a contribution to or an independent expenditure in behalf of another candidate committee, except that a candidate committee may make a contribution to another candidate committee for a fundraising event of such other candidate committee.

(3) Any person violating the provisions of subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 79;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 52;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 16;

Laws 1987, LB 480, § 8.